Utah statutes.
72-10-407.   Permit for new or changed structures or uses -- Nonconforming
structures -- Airport hazards -- Application to board of adjustment for
variance -- Allowance of variance -- Conditioning permit or variance.
(1) (a) Any airport zoning regulations adopted under this part may require
that a permit be obtained before any new structure or use may be constructed
or established and before any existing use or structure may be substantially
changed or substantially altered or repaired.
(b)  All regulations shall provide that before any nonconforming structure or
tree may be replaced, substantially altered or repaired, rebuilt, allowed to
grow higher, or replanted, a permit shall be secured from the administrative
agency authorized to administer and enforce the regulations, authorizing the
replacement, change, or repair.
(c)  A permit may not be granted that allows the establishment or creation of
an airport hazard or permit a nonconforming structure or tree or nonconforming
use to be made or become higher or become a greater hazard to air navigation
than it was when the applicable regulation was adopted or when the application
for a permit is made.
(d)  Except as provided in this Subsection (1), all applications for permits
shall be granted.
(2) (a)  Any person desiring to erect any structure, or increase the height of
any structure, or permit the growth of any tree, or otherwise use the person's
property in violation of airport zoning regulations adopted under this part,
may apply to the board of adjustment for a variance from the zoning
regulations in question.
(b)  A variance shall be allowed where a literal application or enforcement of
the regulations would result in practical difficulty or unnecessary hardship
and the relief granted would not be contrary to the public interest but do
substantial justice and be in accordance with the spirit of the regulations
and this part.
(c)  Any variance may be allowed subject to any reasonable conditions that the
board of adjustment may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
part.
(3)  In granting any permit or variance under this section, the administrative
agency or board of adjustment may, if it considers the action advisable to
effectuate the purposes of this part and reasonable in the circumstances, so
condition a permit or variance as to require the owner of the structure or
tree in question to permit the political subdivision, at its own expense, to
install, operate, and maintain thereon markers and lights as may be necessary
to indicate to flyers the presence of an airport hazard.
